District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

3-341

Possession of disposable containers prohibited; exceptions.

Repealed.

History

Nov. 3, 1977, D.C. Law 2-37, § 2, 24 DCR 4058
Aug. 23, 1994, D.C. Law 10-152, § 21(b), 41 DCR 4636

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-341.
1973 Ed., § 2-1741.

Temporary Addition of Section

For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 3 of Omnibus Sports Consolidation Act of 1994 Temporary Amendment Act of 1995 (D.C. Law 11-67, October 26, 1995, law notification 42 DCR 6172).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary addition (90 days) of section, see § 3 of the Omnibus Sports Consolidation Act of 1994 Emergency Amendment Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-102, July 21, 1995, 42 DCR 4009).

Transfer of Functions

Section 19(a) of D.C. Law 10-152 provided that the Sports Commission shall assume all nonmilitary functions of the Armory board as are set forth in § 2-306 repealed .

Editor's Notes

Effect of dissolution of Sports Commission: See note to § 3-321.

Construction of Law 10-152: See note to § 3-321.